Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.340

Applicability of courts open to all act.

RCW 2.28.300 through 2.28.330 apply to the following courts: The supreme court, the courts of appeal, the superior courts, and to the courts of limited jurisdiction of this state, including district and municipal courts.

[ 2020 c 37 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2020 c 37: See notes following RCW 2.28.300.